en: Brochures
xx: Brochures
cs: Brožury
da: Brochurer
de: Broschüren
es: Folletos
fr: Brochures
it: Brochure
ja: パンフレット
nl: Brochures
no: Brosjyrer
pl: Broszury
pt: Folhetos
ru: Брошюры
sv: Broschyrer
tr: Broşürler

en: Trade Show Counters
xx: Trade Show Counters
cs: Výstavní pulty
da: Messestande
de: Messetheken
es: Mostradores para ferias
fr: Comptoirs de salons professionnels
it: Banconi per fiere
ja: 展示会カウンター
nl: Uitstaltafels voor handelsbeurzen
no: Fagmesseskranker
pl: Lady wystawiennicze
pt: Balcões de feiras comerciais
ru: Выставочные стойки
sv: Utställningsdiskar
tr: Fuar Tezgahları

en: Trade Show Displays
xx: Trade Show Displays
cs: Výstavní expozice
da: Messedisplay
de: Messestand-Displays
es: Expositores para ferias
fr: Présentoirs de salons professionnels
it: Pannelli espositivi per fiere
ja: 展示会ディスプレイ
nl: Displays voor handelsbeurzen
no: Utstillingsutstyr for fagmesser
pl: Stoiska targowe
pt: Displays para feiras comerciais
ru: Выставочные стенды
sv: Bildväggar för mässor
tr: Fuar Stantları

en: Agriculture
xx: Agriculture
cs: Zemědělství
da: Landbrug
de: Landwirtschaft
es: Agricultura
fr: Agriculture
it: Agricoltura
ja: 農業
nl: Agrarische sector
no: Jordbruk
pl: Rolnictwo
pt: Agricultura
ru: Сельское хозяйство
sv: Jordbruk
tr: Tarım

en: Animal Husbandry
xx: Animal Husbandry
cs: Zootechnika
da: Husdyrbrug
de: Viehhaltung
es: Cría de animales
fr: Élevage
it: Zootecnia
ja: 畜産
nl: Veeteelt
no: Husdyrdrift
pl: Hodowla zwierząt
pt: Pecuária
ru: Животноводство
sv: Boskapsskötsel
tr: Hayvancılık

en: Egg Incubators
xx: Egg Incubators
cs: Líhně
da: Rugemaskiner
de: Brutapparate
es: Incubadoras de huevos
fr: Couveuses à œufs
it: Incubatrici di uova
ja: 孵卵器
nl: Broedmachines
no: Rugemaskiner
pl: Inkubatory jaj
pt: Incubadoras de ovos
ru: Инкубаторы для яиц
sv: Äggkläckningsmaskin
tr: Kuluçka Makineleri

en: Livestock Feed
xx: Livestock Feed
cs: Krmiva pro hospodářská zvířata
da: Foder til landbrugsdyr
de: Viehfutter
es: Alimentación de ganado
fr: Nourriture pour bétail
it: Mangime per bestiame
ja: 家畜用飼料
nl: Veevoer
no: Buskapsfôr
pl: Pasza dla zwierząt gospodarskich
pt: Ração para gado
ru: Корм для скота
sv: Boskapsfoder
tr: Besi Hayvanı Yemi

en: Cattle Feed
xx: Cattle Feed
cs: Krmení pro hovězí dobytek
da: Foder til kvæg
de: Rinderfutter
es: Pienso para ganado bovino
fr: Aliments pour bétail
it: Mangime per bovini
ja: 牛飼料
nl: Rundveevoer
no: Storfefor
pl: Pasza dla bydła
pt: Ração para gado bovino
ru: Корм для крупного рогатого скота
sv: Foder till nötkreatur
tr: Sığır Yemleri

en: Chicken Feed
xx: Chicken Feed
cs: Krmení pro slepice
da: Foder til kyllinger
de: Hühnerfutter
es: Pienso para pollos
fr: Aliments pour poulets
it: Mangime per pollame
ja: 鶏飼料
nl: Kippenvoer
no: Hønsefor
pl: Pasza dla kurcząt
pt: Ração para galinhas
ru: Корм для кур
sv: Hönsfoder
tr: Tavuk Yemleri

en: Goat & Sheep Feed
xx: Goat & Sheep Feed
cs: Krmení pro ovce a kozy
da: Foder til geder og får
de: Ziegen- & Schaffutter
es: Pienso para cabras y ovejas
fr: Aliments pour chèvres et moutons
it: Mangime per capre e pecore
ja: 山羊・羊飼料
nl: Geiten- en schapenvoer
no: Geite- og sauefor
pl: Pasza dla kóz i owiec
pt: Ração para cabras e ovelhas
ru: Корм для коз и овец
sv: Get- och fårfoder
tr: Keçi ve Koyun Yemleri

en: Mixed Herd Feed
xx: Mixed Herd Feed
cs: Krmení pro smíšená stáda
da: Foder til blandet dyrebestand
de: Futter für gemischte Herden
es: Alimento para ganado mixto
fr: Aliments pour troupeaux mixtes
it: Mangime per animali da stalla misto
ja: 牛群飼料
nl: Gemengd veevoer
no: Husdyrfor
pl: Pasza dla stada mieszanego
pt: Ração para rebanho misto
ru: Корм для смешанного стада
sv: Blandat foder
tr: Karışık Sürü Yemleri

en: Pig Feed
xx: Pig Feed
cs: Krmení pro prasata
da: Foder til grise
de: Schweinefutter
es: Pienso para cerdos
fr: Aliments pour porcs
it: Mangime per suini
ja: 豚飼料
nl: Varkensvoer
no: Svinefor
pl: Pasza dla trzody chlewnej
pt: Ração para porcos
ru: Корм для свиней
sv: Grisfoder
tr: Domuz Yemleri

en: Livestock Feeders & Waterers
xx: Livestock Feeders & Waterers
cs: Krmítka pro hospodářská zvířata
da: Fodertrug til kreaturer
de: Viehfutterspender
es: Comederos y bebederos de ganado
fr: Mangeoires et abreuvoirs pour bétail
it: Mangiatoie e abbeveratoi per bestiame
ja: 家畜用餌箱
nl: Veevoederbakken
no: Fôrings- og drikkemaskiner for buskap
pl: Karmniki dla zwierząt hodowlanych
pt: Comedouros para gado
ru: Кормушки для скота
sv: Mat- och vattensystem för boskap
tr: Çiftlik Hayvanı Yemlikleri ve Sulukları

en: Livestock Halters
xx: Livestock Halters
cs: Ohlávky
da: Grimer til husdyr
de: Viehhalfter
es: Cabestros para ganado
fr: Licols
it: Cavezze per bestiame
ja: 家畜用頭絡
nl: Halsters voor vee
no: Bissel og seletøy for buskap
pl: Uzdy dla zwierząt hodowlanych
pt: Cabrestos para pecuária
ru: Поводья для скота
sv: Boskapsgrimma
tr: Çiftlik Hayvanı Yularları

en: Automation Control Components
xx: Automation Control Components
cs: Součásti pro automatické řízení
da: Komponenter til automatiseringskontrol
de: Automatisierungskomponenten
es: Componentes de control de automatización
fr: Composants d'automatisation
it: Componenti di controllo dell'automazione
ja: 自動制御部品
nl: Componenten voor automatische bediening
no: Komponenter til automatiseringssystem
pl: Komponenty automatyki przemysłowej
pt: Componentes de controle de automação
ru: Компоненты автоматики
sv: Delar för automatiseringsstyrning
tr: Otomasyon Denetim Bileşenleri

en: Programmable Logic Controllers
xx: Programmable Logic Controllers
cs: Programovatelné logické automaty (PLC)
da: Programmerbare logikcontrollere
de: Speicherprogrammierbare Steuerungen
es: Controladores lógicos programables
fr: Automates programmables industriels
it: Controller logici programmabili
ja: プログラマブルロジックコントローラ
nl: Programmeerbare logische controllers (PLC's)
no: Programmerbar logisk styring
pl: Sterowniki PLC
pt: Controladores lógicos programáveis
ru: Программируемые логические контроллеры
sv: Programmerbara logikkontroller
tr: Programlanabilir Mantık Denetleyicileri

en: Variable Frequency & Adjustable Speed Drives
xx: Variable Frequency & Adjustable Speed Drives
cs: Pohony s měničem frekvence a řízením otáček
da: Frekvensomformere og hastighedsjustering
de: Antriebssysteme mit variabler Frequenz & einstellbarer Drehzahl
es: Variadores de velocidad ajustable y de frecuencia variable
fr: Variateurs de fréquence et de vitesse
it: Variatori di velocità regolabili e a frequenza variabile
ja: 変周波数駆動装置
nl: Aandrijfeenheden met variabele frequentie en snelheid
no: Frekvensomformere og hastighetsjustering
pl: Sterowniki częstotliwości i prędkości obrotowej
pt: Controladores de velocidade ajustáveis e de frequência variável
ru: Частотно-регулируемые приводы
sv: Drivenheter med variabel frekvens och variatorer
tr: Değişken Frekans ve Ayarlanabilir Hız Sürücüleri

en: Construction
xx: Construction
cs: Stavebnictví
da: Byggeri
de: Baugewerbe
es: Construcción
fr: Construction
it: Costruzione
ja: 建築
nl: Bouw
no: Bygg og anlegg
pl: Budownictwo
pt: Construção
ru: Строительство
sv: Konstruktion
tr: İnşaat

en: Surveying
xx: Surveying
cs: Zeměměřičství
da: Undersøgelser
de: Vermessung
es: Agrimensura
fr: Arpentage
it: Perizie
ja: 測量
nl: Landmeetkunde
no: Landmåling
pl: Geodezja
pt: Agrimensura
ru: Товары для межевания
sv: Besiktning
tr: Arazi Ölçümü

en: Traffic Cones & Barrels
xx: Traffic Cones & Barrels
cs: Dopravní kužely a směrové desky
da: Trafikkegler og -tønder
de: Verkehrskegel
es: Conos y balizas de tráfico
fr: Cônes de signalisation
it: Coni stradali
ja: ロードコーン
nl: Verkeerskegels en -pionnen
no: Trafikksylindere og -kjegler
pl: Słupki i barierki drogowe
pt: Cones e barris de trânsito
ru: Дорожные конусы и буферы
sv: Trafikkoner
tr: Trafik Konileri ve Silindirleri